Massachusetts, session 194th, H2577.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 148 is hereby amended by inserting after section 4 the following
new section:
Section 4A. Applicability of the fire laws and fire code in state-owned buildings:-
“The provisions of the state fire code under said chapter 148 of the General Laws, and the
rules and regulations promulgated therefrom by the board of fire prevention regulations, shall
apply to all buildings, structures and property owned, operated or controlled by the
Commonwealth, other than the State House. The Head of the Fire Department, as defined in
section 1 of chapter 148, shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and section with respect to
all buildings, structures and property owned, operated or controlled by the Commonwealth
located within such city, town or district.”
SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1